Arkansas, session 2025, HB1357.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-93-214 is amended to read as follows to
clarify its application and update references:
16-93-214. Mobile application concerning inmates and parolees — Safe
Arkansas App — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, “mobile application” means a computer
software program designed to run on a smartphone, computer tablet, or other
mobile device.
(b)(1) To the extent permitted by federal law, the Parole Post-Prison
Transfer Board shall administer a mobile application that shall provide the
information set out in subsection (c) of this section concerning:
(A) An inmate who is being considered for parole or post-
release supervision; or
(B) A parolee who is on parole or a person who is on post-
release supervision.
(2) The mobile application required under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section shall be known as the “Safe Arkansas App”.
*CEB116*
02-04-2025 10:53:10 CEB116

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 HB1357
(3) To facilitate the administration of the mobile application
required under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the board may seek the
assistance of the Division of Information Systems of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services or enter into a contract for technical
database and data processing services.
(c)(1) The mobile application required under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section shall provide the following information concerning an inmate who
is being considered for parole or post-release supervision:
(A) The name of the inmate;
(B) The Division of Correction identification number of
the inmate;
(C) A current photograph of the inmate;
(D) The date the inmate is eligible for parole or post-
release supervision;
(E) The offense, sentence, date of sentencing, and
sentence length for any conviction for which the inmate is incarcerated; and
(F) Any other relevant public information about the inmate
the board deems necessary.
(2) The mobile application required under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section shall provide the following information concerning a parolee or
person on post-release supervision who is released on parole or post-release
supervision:
(A) The name of the parolee or person on post-release
supervision;
(B) The Division of Correction identification number of
the parolee or person on post-release supervision;
(C) A current photograph of the parolee or person on post-
release supervision;
(D) The offense, sentence, date of sentencing, and
sentence length for any conviction for which the parolee or person on post-
release supervision was incarcerated;
(E) The date the parolee or person on post-release
supervision was released on parole or post-release supervision;
(F) The time served by the parolee or person on post-
release supervision before parole or post-release supervision was granted;
(G) The approximate percentage of the sentence served by
02-04-2025 10:53:10 CEB116

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 HB1357
the inmate or parolee or person on post-release supervision;
(H) If a parolee or person on post-release supervision is
charged with a subsequent charge after being released on parole or post-
release supervision:
(i) Any subsequent charge against the parolee or
person on post-release supervision;
(ii) The date of the subsequent charge against the
parolee or person on post-release supervision; and
(iii) Relevant details of any subsequent charge
against the parolee or person on post-release supervision; and
(I) Any other relevant public information about the
parolee or person on post-release supervision the board deems necessary.
(d) The information required to be posted on the board's mobile
application under subsection (c) of this section:
(1) Shall be consistently updated as required to be the most
current information available to the board; and
(2) May be removed when parole or post-release supervision has
been completed, if an inmate was released on parole or post-release
supervision.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 16-93-622 is amended to read as follows to
clarify its application:
16-93-622. Parole or post-release supervision discharge for offenders
who are minors — Reinstatement of rights.
(a) The Post-Prison Transfer Board may discharge a person from parole
or post-release supervision if:
(1) The person:
(A) Was released on parole or post-release supervision
under § 16-93-621 or any provision of this chapter in which the person's
parole or post-release supervision term exceeds five (5) years, for having
committed an offense as a minor; and
(B) Has served at least five (5) years on parole or post-
release supervision without a violation; and
(2) The prosecuting attorney in the county where the person was
originally convicted has consented to the discharge of the person from parole
or post-release supervision.
02-04-2025 10:53:10 CEB116

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 HB1357
(b) Unless otherwise provided by Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51,
a person who has been discharged from parole or post-release supervision
under subsection (a) of this section shall have his or her constitutional
right to vote restored.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 16-93-1804(4)(B), concerning release
eligibility for felonies committed on or after January 1, 2025, is reenacted
to ratify the decision by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission to change
“seriousness grid” to “sentencing grid” in order to correct a reference
error.
(B) The maximum amount of earned release credits that can
be accrued and granted by the Post-Prison Transfer Board under subdivision
(4)(A) of this section is fifty percent (50%) or seventy-five percent (75%)
of the term of imprisonment imposed by the sentencing court, depending on the
seriousness determination provided in the sentencing grid or table
promulgated by the Arkansas Sentencing Commission and approved by the
Legislative Council.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 16-93-1907(a)(3)(D)(ii)(b), concerning
administrative sanctions under post-release supervision, is reenacted to
ratify the decision by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission to delete “no”
before “more than” in order to correct a word usage error.
(b) If an offender on post-release supervision
accumulates more than thirty (30) days' incarceration in a county or regional
jail or more than three hundred sixty (360) days' incarceration in a Division
of Correction facility or a Division of Community Correction facility as an
intermediate sanction, the community supervision officer shall recommend a
revocation of the offender's post-release supervision under § 16-93-1908.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 16-93-1907(c)(1), concerning administrative
sanctions under post-release supervision, is reenacted to ratify the decision
by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission to change “Division of Correction”
to “Department of Corrections” in order to correct a reference error.
(1) May be reduced by the Department of Corrections for good
behavior and successful program completion; and

02-04-2025 10:53:10 CEB116

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 HB1357

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 16-93-1908(e)(2) is reenacted to ratify the
decision by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission to change “preliminary
hearing” to “revocation hearing” in order to correct a reference error.
(2) If the revocation hearing is not waived by the offender
under subsection (c) of this section, the revocation hearing shall be held
within fourteen (14) days after the arrest and reasonably near the place
where the alleged violation occurred or where the offender was arrested.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 16-114-401(5), concerning definitions under
the Protecting Minors from Medical Malpractice Act of 2023, is repealed
because the defined term is not used in the subchapter.
(5) “Public funds” means the same as defined in § 20-9-1501.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 16-131-206(c), concerning liability and
good faith for settlement agreements under the Arkansas Statutory Thresholds
for Settlement Agreements Involving Minors Act, is amended to read as follows
to add clarifying language:
(c) A person or entity against whom a minor has a claim that settles
the claim with the minor in good faith under this subchapter by entering into
a settlement agreement with the minor's guardian is not liable to the minor
for any claims arising from the settlement of the claim.

SECTION 9. DO NOT CODIFY. CONSTRUCTION AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly
or impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly;
(2) To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the
regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act:
(A) The act of the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly shall be treated as a subsequent act passed by the General
Assembly for the purposes of:
(i) Giving the act of the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly its full force and effect; and
(ii) Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of
02-04-2025 10:53:10 CEB116

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 HB1357
the Arkansas Code of 1987; and
(B) Section 1-2-107 shall not apply; and
(3) This act shall make only technical, not substantive, changes
to the Arkansas Code of 1987.

/s/Gazaway






























02-04-2025 10:53:10 CEB116